Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3714
Violations; effect on title to real estate.

No title to an interest in real estate shall be invalid, voided, or subject to divestiture by reason of a violation of the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act by any former owner or other person who held a former interest in such real estate.

Laws 2024, LB1301, § 17.